New York, session 2025-2026, S3829.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 6805 of the insurance law, as 2 added by chapter 181 of the laws of 2012, is amended to read as follows: 3 (b) A charitable bail organization shall: 4 (1) only deposit money as bail [in the amount of two thousand dollars 5 or less] for a defendant [charged with one or more misdemeanors], 6 provided, however, that such organization shall not execute as surety 7 any bond for any defendant; 8 (2) only deposit money as bail on behalf of a person who is financial- 9 ly unable to post bail, which may constitute a portion or the whole 10 amount of such bail; and 11 (3) [only deposit money as bail in one county in this state. Provided, 12 however, that a charitable bail organization whose principal place of 13 business is located within a city of a million or more may deposit money 14 as bail in the five counties comprising such city; and 15 (4)] not charge a premium or receive compensation for acting as a 16 charitable bail organization. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03729-01-5